Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5658YH (5) 91 da/js H.F. 2740 Section 1. Section 9I.7, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 1 is amended to read as follows: 2 A nonresident alien, foreign business, or foreign 3 government, or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof, which 4 that owns an interest in agricultural land within this state on 5 or after January 1, 1980, shall register the agricultural land 6 with the secretary of state. The registration shall be made 7 within sixty days after January 1, 1980, or within sixty days 8 after acquiring the land or the interest in land, whichever is 9 later. The registration shall be made online or in the form 10 and manner prescribed by the secretary of state. Information 11 described in this section is a confidential record and subject 12 to use in the same manner as provided in section 10B.5. As part 13 of the registration, the nonresident alien, foreign business, 14 or foreign government, or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary 15 thereof, shall file all of the following information: 16 Sec. 2. Section 10B.5, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 2. Information Except as provided in section 10B.5A, 19 information in reports required in this chapter is a 20 confidential record as provided in section 22.7 . The attorney 21 general may have access to the reports, and may use information 22 in the reports in any action to enforce state law, including 23 but not limited to chapters 9H and 9I . The reports shall 24 be made available to members of the general assembly and 25 appropriate committees of the general assembly in order to 26 determine the extent that agricultural land is held in this 27 state by corporations and other business and foreign entities 28 and the effect of such land ownership upon the economy of this 29 state. The secretary of state shall assist any committee of 30 the general assembly studying these issues. 31 Sec. 3. Section 10B.5A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 10B.5A Annual summary to governor and general assembly ââ 34 foreign landholdings . 35 -1- LSB 5658YH (5) 91 da/js 1/ 3 H.F. 2740 The secretary of state shall prepare an annual summary of 1 foreign landholding. The summary must be a report summarizing 2 the compiled information included in the current registrations 3 filed pursuant to section 9I.7 and the last reports filed 4 pursuant to section 10B.4 . The information is a confidential 5 record as provided in section 22.7 . The attorney general may 6 have access to the annual summary and may use information 7 in the annual summary in any action to enforce state law, 8 including but not limited to chapters 9H and 9I , and this 9 chapter . The annual summary shall be made available to the 10 governor, members of the general assembly, and appropriate 11 committees of the general assembly in order to determine the 12 extent that agricultural land is held in this state by foreign 13 entities and the effect of such land ownership upon the economy 14 of this state. Upon request, the secretary of state shall 15 assist any committee of the general assembly studying these 16 issues. 17